Maine, session 132, LD253.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3196, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 274, §1, is repealed.
SUMMARY
Public Law 2019, chapter 274 enacted the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section
3196, which requires the Department of Health and Human Services to provide coverage
to a MaineCare member for abortion services. Abortion services that are not federally
approved Medicaid services must be funded by the State.
This bill repeals Title 22, section 3196, removing the requirement that the department
fund abortion services for MaineCare members and removing the requirement that the State
pay when the abortion services are not covered by Medicaid.
Page 1 - 132LR1134(01)